District of Columbia statutes.
29-602.02

Formation of partnership.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, the association of 2 or more persons to carry on as co-owners of a business for profit shall form a partnership, whether or not the persons intend to form a partnership.

(b)

An association formed under a statute other than this chapter, a predecessor statute, or a comparable statute of another jurisdiction shall not be a partnership under this chapter.

(c)

In determining whether a partnership is formed, the following rules shall apply:

(1)

Joint tenancy, tenancy in common, tenancy by the entireties, joint property, common property, or part ownership shall not by itself establish a partnership, even if the co-owners share profits made by the use of the property.

(2)

The sharing of gross returns shall not by itself establish a partnership, even if the persons sharing them have a joint or common right or interest in property from which the returns are derived.

(3)

A person that receives a share of the profits of a business shall be presumed to be a partner in the business, unless the profits were received in payment:

(A)

Of a debt by installments or otherwise;

(B)

For services as an independent contractor or of wages or other compensation to an employee;

(C)

Of rent;

(D)

Of an annuity or other retirement or health benefit to a beneficiary, representative, or designee of a deceased or retired partner;

(E)

Of interest or other charge on a loan, even if the amount of payment varies with the profits of the business, including a direct or indirect present or future ownership of the collateral, or rights to income, proceeds, or increase in value derived from the collateral; or

(F)

For the sale of the goodwill of a business or other property by installments or otherwise.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-101.02, § 29-601.02, § 29-604.02, and § 47-2855.01.

Section References

2001 Ed., § 33-102.02.
1981 Ed., § 41-152.2.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 202 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).

Editor's Notes